Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB335.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A city, county, charter county government, urban-county government, unified
local government, consolidated local government, or special district shall not
adopt or enforce any ordinance, regulation, or other rule that restricts the
occupancy of any dwelling unit:
(a) To less than two (2) occupants per bedroom; or
(b) Based on the familial or nonfamilial relationship or marital status among
the occupants.
(2) This section shall not be construed to affect a local government's ability to
enforce the state building code or any uniform code or administrative regulation
related to fire safety or the construction or safety of buildings.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/27/2026 4:19 PM Jacketed